Georgia, session 2025_26, HB605.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
Article 1 of Chapter 2A of Title 31 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to
general provisions related to the Department of Public Health, is amended by adding a new
Code section to read as follows:
H. B. 605
- 1 -

LC 61 0019
"31-2A-21.
(a) As used in this Code section, the term:
(1) 'Alternative nicotine product', 'cigarette', 'tobacco product', 'tobacco related object',
and 'vapor product' shall have the same meanings as set forth in Code Section 16-12-170.
(2) 'Quit Line' means the Georgia Tobacco Quit Line operated by the Department of
Public Health pursuant to this Code section.
(b) Subject to appropriations or the availability of other funds, the department shall
continue to operate, maintain, and make available a public health service to help Georgians
quit smoking, vaping, and using all forms of tobacco products, known as the Georgia
Tobacco Quit Line. The department may contract for the design, operation, and
maintenance of the Quit Line.
(c) The Quit Line shall be available 24 hours a day, seven days a week. The Quit Line
shall:
(1) Provide cessation services that address the use of all tobacco products;
(2) Provide telephone, text, and internet based services for users of tobacco products,
vapor products, and alternative nicotine products, provided that such users are 13 years
of age or older;
(3) Provide services and support for pregnant and postpartum women who use tobacco
products, vapor products, or alternative nicotine products;
(4) Provide support in multiple languages;
(5) Provide referrals to community resources, when applicable;
(6) Provide free supplies of nicotine replacement therapies, such as gum or patches, for
qualified Georgia residents 18 years of age and older;
(7) Provide information about lung cancer screening to individuals accessing the Quit
Line, evaluate lung cancer screening eligibility for individuals accessing the Quit Line,
and provide referrals to lung cancer screening services, when applicable;
(8) Follow national guidelines for treating tobacco use and dependence;
H. B. 605
- 2 -

LC 61 0019
(9) Implement practices to comply with all applicable laws respecting individual and
patient privacy;
(10) Implement practices to ensure the security of any data collected, if applicable, in
line with industry best practices and in compliance with all applicable laws; and
(11) Utilize de-identified data to track the success of the Quit Line's operations and
identify trends in service needs and outcomes.
(d) The department shall design appropriate written materials, including signage and
materials for distribution by retailers to individuals who purchase cigarettes, tobacco
products, vapor products, or alternative nicotine products, to inform individuals about the
Quit Line. Such written materials shall include:
(1) Information on the services provided by the Quit Line, including information about
services related to lung cancer screening;
(2) Information on the effectiveness of and eligibility for lung cancer screening; and
(3) Contact information for the Quit Line, such as a telephone number or a public
website.
(e)(1) Any person owning or operating a place of business in which cigarettes, tobacco
products, tobacco related objects, vapor products, or alternative nicotine products are sold
or offered for sale shall post in a conspicuous place signage designed by the department
pursuant to subsection (d) of this Code section.
(2) Any person provided for in paragraph (1) of this subsection shall distribute to
individuals purchasing cigarettes, tobacco products, vapor products, or alternative
nicotine products the written materials designed by the department pursuant to subsection
(d) of this Code section."
SECTION 2.
All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
H. B. 605
- 3 -